Utah statutes.
9-6-302.   Honorary life membership.

(1)  Any person who submits to the board a work of art executed by himself which is accepted by the board shall, by the tender and acceptance of that work of art and on receipt of a certificate of membership issued by the board, become an honorary member for life.

(2)  The board may also confer an honorary life membership for outstanding achievement in art, literature, or music upon any resident of the state.



Amended by Chapter 4, 1993 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 78, 1993 General Session

